Hawaii statutes.
[§708-8303] Unlicensed contractor fraud in
the first degree. (1) A person commits the offense of unlicensed
contractor fraud in the first degree if the person commits unlicensed
contractor fraud and the total value of the property over which the person
obtains control is equal to or greater than $20,000.

(2) Unlicensed contractor fraud in the first
degree is a class B felony. [L 2012, c 244, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next